Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 1. Foreclosure.

Sec. 34.35.005.
Action for foreclosure.

When an action is required to enforce a lien provided for in this chapter and the action falls within the monetary jurisdiction of the district court, the action shall be started in the district court in the judicial district in which venue lies. An action that exceeds the monetary jurisdiction of the district court shall be started in the superior court in the judicial district in which venue lies. The procedure, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, is the same as in the trial of an action to secure property to hold it for the satisfaction of a lien against it.

In an action to enforce a lien, the court shall allow as part of the costs all money paid for drawing the lien and for filing and recording the lien claim, and a reasonable attorney fee for the foreclosure of the lien.

An action to enforce a lien created by AS

34.35.005

—

34.35.425

has preference upon the calendar of civil actions before the court and shall be tried without unnecessary delay.

History.

(§ 26-9-3 ACLA 1949; am § 11 ch 17 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.35.010.
Joinder of claimants in lien statement.

Any number of persons who claim liens under AS

34.35.005

—

34.35.425

against the same property may join in one statement of lien.
The consolidated statement of lien shall be verified by the oath of one or more of the claimants having knowledge of the facts.

History.

(§ 26-9-2 ACLA 1949)

Collateral references. —

53 Am. Jur. 2d, Mechanics’ Liens, § 335 et seq.

Sec. 34.35.015.
Joinder in foreclosure suit.

Any number of persons who claim liens against the same property may join in the same action, and when separate actions are commenced the court may consolidate them.

History.

(§ 26-9-4 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.020.
Sufficiency in lien notice or pleadings.

A mistake in formality or lack of statement in the lien notice or the pleadings is not ground for dismissal or unnecessary delay in an action to foreclose a lien.

Substantial compliance with the law relating to the contents of the lien notice is considered sufficient, if the notice satisfactorily shows the name of the claimant, the amount of the demand, the time of the employment, the property sought to be charged with the lien sufficient for identification, and the name of the owner or reputed owner of the property.

The inclusion of nonlienable items in the amount of the claimant’s demand or error in the terms and conditions of the contract of employment, if there is a contract of employment, or other error in the lien notice, made in good faith, is not considered material, unless the error affects the substantial rights of the adverse party, acquired in good faith without notice.

The lien notice and pleadings may be amended at any time before judgment. If a material statement or averment is omitted or misstated, this is ground for a reasonable delay or continuance to enable opposing parties to meet the amendment, and a nonsuit or dismissal may not be entertained in the action except upon the merits of the cause.

History.

(§ 26-9-5 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.025.
Parties to foreclosure.

In an action to foreclose a lien created by AS

34.35.005

—

34.35.425

, all persons personally liable and all lien holders whose claims have been recorded, and all other persons interested in the matter in controversy or the property sought to be charged with the lien may be made parties.
Persons who are not parties are not bound by the proceedings.

History.

(§ 26-9-6 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in this section in 1988 because of the enactment of ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Collateral references. —

53 Am. Jur. 2d, Mechanics’ Liens, § 335 et seq.

Liability of purchaser of real estate on mechanic’s lien based on goods or labor supplied to vendor but filed after title passed. 33 ALR4th 1017.

Sec. 34.35.030.
Lien claim against different properties.

If a lien claim is filed for the same labor against two separate kinds of property owned or claimed by different persons, the court shall determine the liability of each kind of property and designate which shall be sold first to discharge the amount of the lien claim.

History.

(§ 26-9-7 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.035.
Several judgment for each claimant.

In an action to enforce a lien judgment shall be given in favor of each person having a lien for the amount due the person, and the court shall order property subject to the lien to be sold by the peace officer in the same manner that property is sold on execution, or in any manner that the court considers proper.
The proceeds of the sale shall be apportioned to the payment of each judgment pro rata, if the amount is insufficient to pay them in full.

History.

(§ 26-9-8 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.040.
Order of priority and payment. [Repealed, § 19 ch 175 SLA 1978. For current law see AS 34.35.112.]

Sec. 34.35.045.
Lienor’s action on contract.

Except as otherwise expressly provided, nothing in AS

34.35.005

—

34.35.425

may be construed to prevent a lienor under a contract from maintaining an action as if the lienor has no lien for the security of the debt and the bringing of this action does not prejudice rights under AS

34.35.005

—

34.35.425

.

History.

(§ 26-9-11 ACLA 1949)